Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma Health


Care Safety Net and Affordable Prescriptions Accessibility Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5400 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:



Req. No. 759 Page 1


1. “340B drug” means a drug that has been subject to any offer


for reduced prices by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C., Section


256b, and is purchased by a covered entity as defined in 42 U.S.C.,


Section 256b(a)(4);


2. “340B entity” means an entity participating or authorized to


participate in the federal 340B drug discount program, as described


in 42 U.S.C., Section 256b, including its pharmacy, or any pharmacy


contracted with the participating entity to dispense drugs purchased


through the 340B drug discount program;


3. “Pharmacy” means a pharmacy licensed by the State Board of


Pharmacy, except that patients who are provided pharmacy care shall


be physically located in the state; and


4. “Pharmacy benefits manager” means a person that performs


pharmacy benefits management and any other person acting for such


person under a contractual or employment relationship in the


performance of pharmacy benefits management for a managed care


company, nonprofit hospital, medical service organization, insurance


company, third-party payor, or a health program administered by a


department of this state.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5401 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:





Req. No. 759 Page 2


A. 1. With respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for 340B


drugs, a health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefits manager, other


third-party payor, or its agent shall not:


a. reimburse a 340B entity for 340B drugs at a rate lower


than that paid for the same drug to entities that are


not 340B entities or lower reimbursement for a claim


on the basis that the claim is for a 340B drug,


b. impose any terms or conditions on any 340B entity with


respect to any of the following that differ from such


terms or conditions applied to non-340B entities on


the basis that the entity participates in the federal


340B drug discount program set forth in 42 U.S.C.,


Section 256b, or that a drug is a 340B drug. Such


terms and conditions shall include, but not be limited


to, any of the following:


(1) fees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or


assessments. For purposes of this subsection,


the term “other adjustments” includes placing any


additional requirements, restrictions, or


unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that


result in administrative costs or fees to the


340B entity that are not placed upon other


entities that do not participate in the 340B drug


discount program, including affiliate pharmacies

Req. No. 759 Page 3


of the health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefits


manager, or other third-party payor,


(2) dispensing fees that are less than the dispensing


fees for non-340B entities,


(3) restrictions or requirements regarding


participation in standard or preferred pharmacy


networks,


(4) requirements relating to the frequency or scope


of audits of inventory management systems,


(5) requirements that a claim for a drug include any


identification, billing modifier, attestation, or


other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in


order to be processed or resubmitted unless it is


required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid


Services or the Oklahoma Health Care Authority


for the administration of the Oklahoma Medicaid


program, or


(6) any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or


policies that are not imposed on non-340B


entities,


c. require a 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or clarify


a claim after the initial adjudication unless these


actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business


and not related to 340B drug pricing,

Req. No. 759 Page 4


d. discriminate against a 340B entity in a manner that


prevents or interferes with any patient’s choice to


receive such drugs from the 340B entity, including the


administration of such drugs. For purposes of this


subsection, it is considered a discriminatory practice


that prevents or interferes with a patient’s choice to


receive drugs at a 340B entity if a health insurance


issuer, pharmacy benefits manager, or other third-


party payor places any additional requirements,


restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B


entity that results in administrative costs or fees to


the 340B entity, including, but not limited to,


requiring a claim for a drug to include any


identification, billing modifier, attestation, or


other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order


to be processed or resubmitted unless it is required


by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or


the Oklahoma Health Care Authority in administration


of the Oklahoma Medicaid program,


e. include any other provision in a contract between a


health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefits manager, or


other third-party payor and a 340B entity that


discriminates against the 340B entity or prevents or


interferes with an individual’s choice to receive a

Req. No. 759 Page 5


prescription drug from a 340B entity, including the


administration of the drug, in person or via direct


delivery, mail, or other form of shipment, or creation


of a restriction or additional charge on a patient who


chooses to receive drugs from a 340B entity,


f. require or compel the submission of ingredient costs


or pricing data pertaining to 340B drugs to any health


insurance issuer, pharmacy benefits manager, or other


third-party payor, or


g. exclude any 340B entity from the health insurance


issuer, pharmacy benefits manager, or other third-


party payor network on the basis that the 340B entity


dispenses drugs subject to an agreement under 42


U.S.C., Section 256b, or refuse to contract with a


340B entity for reasons other than those that apply


equally to non-340B entities.


B. Nothing in this section applies to the Oklahoma Medicaid


program as payor when Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered


outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C., Section 1396r-8(k).


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5402 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A manufacturer or distributor shall not deny, restrict,


prohibit, or otherwise interfere with, either directly or

Req. No. 759 Page 6


indirectly, the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B


drug to, a pharmacy that is under contract with a 340B entity and is


authorized under such contract to receive and dispense 340B drugs on


behalf of the covered entity unless such receipt is prohibited by


the United States Department of Health and Human Services.


B. A manufacturer or distributor shall not interfere with a


pharmacy contracted with a 340B entity.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5403 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Attorney General may make rules and regulations


interpreting the provisions of this act, and shall make


recommendations to the Insurance Commissioner for enforcement with


the jurisdiction of the Insurance Commissioner.


B. The Insurance Commissioner may censure, suspend, revoke, or


refuse to issue or renew a license of or levy a civil penalty


against any person licensed under the insurance laws of this state


for any violation of this act.


C. In addition to or in lieu of any applicable censure,


suspension, or revocation of a license, a manufacturer, distributor,


health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefits manager, other third-


party payor, or its agent may be subject to a civil fine not less


than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and not greater than Ten Thousand



Req. No. 759 Page 7


Dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation of the provisions of this


act. A violation occurs each time a prohibited act is committed.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5404 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Nothing in this section is to be construed or applied to be


less restrictive than federal law for a person or entity regulated


by this act.


B. Nothing in this act is to be construed or applied to be in


conflict with any of the following:


1. Applicable federal law and related regulations; or


2. Other laws of this state if the state law is compatible with


applicable federal law.


C. Limited distribution of a drug required under 21 U.S.C.,


Section 355-1, is not to be construed as a violation of this


section.


SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-759 CAD 1/16/2025 3:01:37 PM











Req. No. 759 Page 8